Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 49-15-78.
Prohibition against using gill net, trammel net, entanglement net, or like contrivance within a certain distance of the shoreline; punishment.

It is unlawful for a person to use a gill net, trammel net, entanglement net, or like contrivances for the taking of fish in marine waters within one-half (1/2) mile of the shoreline.

A violation of this section is punishable by the penalties provided in Section 49-15-100, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 379, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 49-15-79.
Prohibition of use of purse seine offshore from Hancock or Harrison Counties; promulgation of regulations governing use of gill nets and trammel nets in Hancock, Harrison, and Jackson Counties; punishment.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to use or attempt to use a purse seine for the taking of fish or to have such seine in the water within one (1) mile of the shoreline of the County of Hancock or Harrison in the State of Mississippi. The Boards of Supervisors of Hancock, Harrison and Jackson Counties shall have the authority to submit proposed regulations to the commission to regulate within their respective counties the use of and trammel nets. The commission may consider all such proposals submitted by the boards of supervisors in formulating regulations to be promulgated under this section.

A person, firm or corporation convicted of a violation of this section or regulations promulgated under this section shall be punished by the penalties provided in Section 49-15-100(2), Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 601, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 24; Laws, 1997, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-15-80.
Vessels used to catch or transport fish; licensing and fees; nonresident reciprocity.

All vessels to be used in catching or transporting fish in the waters of the State of Mississippi for commercial purposes shall, before beginning operations, obtain an annual license from the commission and pay a license fee according to the following schedule:

All resident vessels engaged in commercial hook and line or gig fishing shall be issued an annual license by the commission at a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). All nonresident vessels engaged in commercial hook and line or gig fishing shall be issued an annual license by the commission at a fee of Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00). Each individual engaged in commercial hook and line or gig fishing must obtain a commercial fisherman license subject to the following license fees: One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for a resident commercial fisherman license; or Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) for a nonresident commercial fisherman license. If a duly licensed commercial hook and line or gig fishing vessel is engaged in commercial fishing, each individual aboard must possess a commercial fisherman license.

A resident fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or a nonresident fee of Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00), on boats using trammel nets, gill nets or seines not more than one thousand two hundred (1,200) feet in length.

Beginning September 15, 1994, no nonresident shall be issued a commercial fishing license under this chapter for the taking of fish using any type of net if that nonresident’s state of domicile prohibits the issuing of commercial fishing licenses to residents of this state to engage in like activity.

Each factory or manufacturing establishment engaging in the manufacture of oil, fish scrap, fish meal, fertilizer or other products from menhaden, shall pay a license fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

Each boat or vessel engaging in the catching, taking or transporting menhaden in the waters of the State of Mississippi, the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and shall pay Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each net, seine, trawl or purse net used in catching or taking menhaden in the waters of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 15; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-15-81.
Catching or transporting saltwater minnows for sale; license requirements; fees; tagging of minnow traps to mark ownership; exemptions.

The term “saltwater minnow” as used in this section shall mean any species within the families Cyprinodontidae, Fundulidae or Poeciliidae.

Before beginning operations to catch or transport saltwater minnows for sale, fishermen must obtain a saltwater live bait license and pay a fee according to the following schedule: A resident shall pay a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), a nonresident shall pay a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or if the nonresident’s domicile state charges more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for residents of Mississippi to engage in a like activity, then that applicant shall pay the same fee or fees that the applicant’s domicile state charges residents of Mississippi.

All minnow traps placed in or on the marine waters of the State of Mississippi shall have a corrosion resistant metal or plastic tag attached to the trap to permanently mark the minnow traps for ownership. The tag used to mark the traps shall be legibly and permanently stamped with letters containing the applicable licensed minnow fishermen’s full name. The minimum height of the letters shall be at least three-sixteenths (3/16) of an inch. The tags shall be supplied by the minnow fisherman.

Licensed live bait catcher boats and licensed live bait dealers involved in the transporting of minnows are exempt from the commercial minnow licensing requirement in subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 9, 2011.).

§ 49-15-83.
Interpretation and application of Sections 49-15-71 through 49-15-81.

Nothing in Sections 49-15-71 through 49-15-81 shall be interpreted to circumvent or diminish the powers of the commission in the exercise of its jurisdiction and authority as provided under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 21; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 23, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-84.
Requirements for the taking of crabs; crab traps.

The commission shall coordinate with the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory in the development of an ordinance for the purpose of taking Callinectes sapidus (blue crab) or allied species. The ordinance shall include provisions for the establishment of size limits for individual or market use as well as establishing legal harvest size for the cultivating of peeler crabs and soft-shell crabs.

The commission shall establish specifications for crab traps and shall require buoys of adequate size which are identified as to the owner of the buoys and traps. Recreational crabbers may use no more than six (6) crab traps per household. The taking of crabs with drop nets is permitted without a license.

It is unlawful to catch, hold or have in possession any female sponge crab or any female crab bearing visible eggs at any time. It is not unlawful to catch those crabs unintentionally, if the crabs are immediately returned to the water.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 16; Laws, 2002, ch. 525, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 49-15-84.1.
Closed season for use of crab traps; removal of abandoned traps.

The commission may establish a closed season for the use of crab traps in the public waters of this state. The commission may designate the closed season as not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days per year. Any crab trap remaining in the public waters after the expiration to the seventh day of a closed season may be considered as abandoned under the regulations established by the commission.

The commission shall adopt rules to govern the removal and disposal of abandoned crab traps as necessary to enhance:

The conservation and management of crab resources;

Boating safety;

The cleanliness of the beds and bottoms of the public waters of the state; and

Enforcement of this chapter.

Abandoned crab traps are litter and are subject to immediate removal and disposal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 525, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 49-15-85.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2002, ch. 525, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Laws, 1988, ch. 548, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.]

§ 49-15-86.
Commercial and recreational crabbing licenses.

Each person catching or taking any saltwater crabs in the waters of the State of Mississippi for commercial purposes shall obtain a license from the commission and shall pay an annual resident license fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) or an annual nonresident license fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) on each boat used therefor.

The commission may require a recreational crabber’s license for an administrative fee not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 17, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-87.
“Peeler crab” and “soft-shell crab” defined.

“Peeler crab” means a blue crab having a new soft shell fully developed under the hard shell and having a definite white, pink or red line or rim on the outer edge of the back fin or flipper.

“Soft-shell crab” means a peeler crab which has recently shed its hard shell.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 548, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-15-89.
Unlawful to catch, destroy, confine, hold or have in possession certain crabs.

It shall be unlawful for any person to catch, destroy, confine, hold or have in his possession, whether for individual use or for market, any of the genus callinectes sapidus (blue crab) or allied species, of a smaller size than five (5) inches measured from the tip of one (1) lateral spine across the back of the shell to the tip of the opposite lateral spine; provided that peeler crabs and soft-shell crabs are exempt from these limitations. Conservation officers may inspect any catch for violations of any of the provisions of Sections 49-15-83 through 49-15-91.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 548, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-15-91.
Regulatory authority for maximum number of crab pots allowable per licensee.

The commission may establish a maximum number of crab pots allowable per licensee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 548, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-15-92.
Penalties for theft of crab traps or crabs.

Any person who steals, takes and carries away crab traps or the property of another used to catch saltwater crabs, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned for not more than ninety (90) days, or both, for the first offense; for the second offense, when the offense is committed within three (3) years of the first offense, shall be fined not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); for the third and subsequent offenses when committed within three (3) years of the first offense, shall be fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months.

Any person, firm or corporation convicted and sentenced under this section for a second or subsequent offense shall not be considered for a reduction of the fine.

In addition to the penalties in subsection (1), any person who steals, removes, takes or carries away the crabs from another person’s crab traps shall also pay restitution to the owner of the traps for the crabs taken.

This section shall not apply to any person who removes crab traps that are illegally placed or in an illegal location. This section shall not apply to any person who catches abandoned crab traps in a shrimp trawl, keeps the crab traps aboard the vessel and properly disposes of the crab traps.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 49-15-93.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of Sections 49-15-83 through 49-15-91 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by Section 49-15-63, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 548, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-15-94.
Use of purse seine to catch mullet during roe mullet season; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to use a purse seine to catch mullet during the roe mullet season. A violation of this subsection is punishable by the penalties provided in Section 49-15-100(2) for the unlawful use of gill or trammel nets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 28, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 49-15-95.
Use of brill and cast nets.

It is unlawful to use brill and cast nets greater than twelve (12) feet in radius in the marine waters of the state.

The commission shall not prohibit the use of brill and cast nets in the waters designated in subsection (1) of this section. No person shall catch more than fifty (50) pounds of shrimp per day using brill and cast nets as provided by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 550, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 25; Laws, 2001, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-15-96.
Keeping of certain fish caught in shrimp nets for personal consumption.

Vessels licensed under Section 49-15-64.5 may keep in whole, for personal consumption only the following types of fish which are caught in the shrimp nets or trawls of the vessel: white trout; croaker, black drum, and ground mullet (Family Sciaenidae); sheepshead (Family Sparidae); gafftopsail catfish (Family Ariidae); and flounder (Family Bothidae and Family Pleuronectidae). The cumulative total of fish shall not exceed twenty-five (25) pounds. In addition, a vessel may keep three (3) dozen blue crabs (portunidae family). This exemption for personal consumption does not apply to fish or crabs that are otherwise illegal to possess or catch.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 610, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 24; Laws, 2000, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 49-15-97.
Requirement that commercial fishing vessels use approved lights; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any commercial fisherman, firm or corporation to operate a vessel during the hours of sunset to sunrise when the season or time for such fishing is closed or in an area that is closed to fishing without using or displaying lights which comply with all federal regulations applicable to that vessel operated by the fisherman, firm or corporation.

For the purpose of this section, the term “commercial fisherman” shall mean a commercially licensed boat, commercially licensed fisherman or any person in possession of commercial fishing gear who would be subject to regulation under this chapter.

Any person, firm or corporation that violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) or more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense; and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the second offense when the second offense is committed within a period of three (3) years after the date on which the first offense was committed; and not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) or imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than thirty (30) days for a third or subsequent offense when that offense is committed within a period of three (3) years after the date on which the first offense was committed.

Any fine or sentence, or both, imposed upon a person for a second, third or subsequent offense under this section shall not be suspended or reduced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-98.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2001, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

[Laws, 1994, ch. 579, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

§ 49-15-99.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 28, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved August 24, 1994).

[Laws, 1994, ch. 579, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994]

§ 49-15-100.
Usage of gill or trammel nets in certain marine waters; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to set a gill or trammel net in the marine waters of the state north of Highway 90.

For a first offense, a violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), nor more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) and the department may initiate forfeiture proceedings for the net and catch. For subsequent violations, a person is subject to a fine of not less than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00), nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and shall forfeit nets and catch. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated.

The penalties for a violation of this section shall not be suspended or reduced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 579, § 3; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 28, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-15-100.1.
Forfeiture of vessels, motors and equipment used in violation of Section 49-15-100.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to set a gill or trammel net in the marine waters of the state north of Highway 90. Any person, firm or corporation violating this section shall be punished as provided for under Section 49-15-100 and in addition shall forfeit vessel, motor and equipment used in the violation. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 611, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-15-100.3.
Prima facie evidence of use of prohibited equipment.

The possession of a gill net, trammel net or like contrivance, or any other equipment prohibited for use in the taking or harvesting of seafood under this chapter on a vessel on the marine waters of this state where the use of the net, contrivance or equipment is prohibited, shall constitute prima facie evidence that an offense has been committed to take or harvest seafood with nets, contrivances or equipment prohibited by this chapter, unless the vessel is:

Anchored or moored at a permanent facility intended for the mooring of vessels;

Traveling directly between a marina, harbor or public boat launching facility and a United States Coast Guard marked and maintained navigation channel; or

Traveling within a United States Coast Guard marked and maintained navigation channel.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 611, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.